Wyoming, session 2026, SF0007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-3-402(c)(iii) and (j) and
6-3-411(e) are amended to read:
6-3-402. Theft; penalties.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (g) and (j) of
this section, theft is:
(iii) A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not more than six (6) months one (1) year, a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or both, if the
value of the property is less than one thousand dollars
($1,000.00).
(j) Any person convicted of a fifth third or
subsequent offense for theft, shoplifting, larceny,
wrongful taking of property, wrongful disposal of property
or livestock rustling, any other theft offense under this
section, any theft offense under a municipal ordinance or
any theft offense pursuant to a substantially similar law
of another jurisdiction separately brought and tried shall
be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
6-3-411. Unlawful use of theft detection shielding
devices; penalty.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0007
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) A person who commits any of the offenses
specified under subsections (a) through (d) of this section
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not more than six (6) months one (1) year, a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or both.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2